Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 9 Initiatives, Referenda, and Constitutional Amendments
7-9-303. Apportionment of delegates — Vacancies.

(a)

The basis for representation in any constitutional convention called as a result of an affirmative vote on the calling of a constitutional convention shall be as follows: One hundred (100) members shall be elected from the same districts and on the same basis as members of the House of Representatives of the General Assembly.

(b)

Vacancies in positions of delegates shall be filled by appointment by the convention from the same district in which the vacancy occurred.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-106.

7-9-304. Nominating petitions.

(a)(1)

Every person desiring to be elected as a delegate from a particular House of Representatives district shall file a nominating petition with the Secretary of State containing at least fifty (50) signatures thereon of persons who are qualified electors within the district.

(2)

In addition, he or she shall pay a filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

(3)

When petitions are filed on behalf of a candidate, they shall contain a statement signed by the candidate and filed along with the petition indicating the candidate's willingness to accept the nomination and to serve as a delegate.

(b)

Persons who circulate nominating petitions shall execute an affidavit concerning the genuineness of the signatures in like manner as now required for the circulators of petitions for initiative acts and constitutional amendments.

(c)

The petitions shall be filed with the Secretary of State not less than eighty-one (81) days before the next general election, and the Secretary of State shall certify the names of all candidates and the position that each is seeking to the county board of election commissioners of the counties in the respective House of Representatives districts not later than seventy-five (75) days prior to the date of the election. A candidate must designate the position he or she is seeking at the time he or she files his or her nominating petition with the Secretary of State, and after having designated a position, the candidate is prohibited from changing to a different position.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-107; Acts 2007, No. 1049, § 31; 2011, No. 1185, § 13.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment, in (c), substituted “not less than seventy (70) days” for “not less than forty (40) days” and “not later than seventy (70) days” for “not later than thirty (30) days.”

The 2011 amendment, in (c), substituted “eighty-one (81)” for “seventy (70)” and “seventy-five (75)” for “seventy (70).”

7-9-305. Election and certification of delegates.

(a)

The county board of election commissioners shall include on the general election ballots the names of all candidates for delegate to the constitutional convention as certified by the Secretary of State.

(b)(1)

The candidate receiving a majority of the votes for a particular position in the general election shall be declared elected as a delegate to the convention.

(2)(A)

In the event that more than two (2) candidates are seeking a particular delegate position and no candidate receives a majority of the votes cast for all candidates for the position, the names of the two (2) candidates receiving the highest number of votes for the position shall be certified to a special runoff election that shall be held by the respective county board of election commissioners of the district four (4) weeks from the day on which the general election is held.

(B)

The special runoff election shall be conducted in the same manner as is provided by law, and the election results shall be canvassed and certified in the manner provided by law.

(3)

A tie vote for a delegate position in the special runoff election shall be determined by drawing lots in the presence of the circuit court of the county within ten (10) days from the date of the election.

(c)

The results of the election of delegates at the general election or at a special runoff election held for delegate positions shall be certified to the Secretary of State along with the other election results as is now provided by law.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-108; Acts 1993, No. 512, § 11; 2007, No. 1020, § 19; 2017, No. 1104, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “three (3) weeks” for “two (2) weeks” in (b)(2).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (b)(2) as present (b)(2)(A) and (b)(2)(B); in (b)(2)(A), deleted “that” preceding “no candidate” and substituted “four (4) weeks” for “three (3) weeks”; and deleted “now” preceding “provided” in (b)(2)(B).

7-9-306. Organizational meeting — Plenary meeting.

(a)

Whenever a majority of the electors vote affirmatively to call a constitutional convention, it shall be the duty of the delegates elected as prescribed in §7-9-305 to assemble at the State Capitol Building at 10:00 a.m. on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in January next after their election for an organizational meeting of no longer than two (2) days' duration.

(b)

This meeting shall be for the purpose of electing permanent convention officers, adopting rules of procedure, and providing for such interim committees and staff members as may be necessary to prepare for the plenary meeting of the convention which shall convene at the State Capitol Building in the chamber of the House of Representatives on the first Monday of the following April.

(c)

The Secretary of State shall preside at the organizational meeting until the permanent convention chair is selected, and he or she may vote in case of a tie vote in the selection of a permanent chair.

(d)

At the meeting each member shall take an oath to support the Constitution of the United States and to faithfully discharge the duties of a convention delegate.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, §§ 6, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 2-109, 2-110; Acts 2013, No. 1126, § 17.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (b), inserted “chamber of the” and substituted “of Representatives” for “Chamber”.

7-9-307. Meeting procedures.

(a)

A majority of the delegates shall constitute a quorum, and a majority of the total number of delegates shall be required for approval of any section to be included in a proposed constitution or part thereof or in a proposed constitutional amendment.

(b)

The constitutional convention shall elect its own officers and shall be sole judges of the qualifications and election of its own membership.

(c)

All meetings of the convention shall be open to the public.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-110.

7-9-308. Duration of constitutional convention — Certification of draft constitution — Report.

(a)

The constitutional convention shall remain in session as long as is required to transact its business and to meet its responsibilities, but not past the following July 1. If the convention determines that additional time is needed, it may vote to recess until the following August 1 and resume its sessions on that date, but the convention may not extend its sessions past the following September 1, and it must adjourn itself sine die no later than September 1.

(b)

Thereafter and not later than September 15 next, the finished draft of the proposed constitution shall be certified by the president and the secretary of the convention to the Secretary of State.

(c)

The convention shall also publish a report to the people explaining its proposals.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-109.

7-9-309. Method of publication.

(a)

Publication of a proposed new constitution by a constitutional convention called by the people of the state at a general election shall be made by one (1) of the following methods, whichever is less costly to the state:

(1)

One (1) time at the rate of two and one-half cents (2½¢) per word in each legal newspaper in the state by insertion of preprinted copies of the proposed new constitution furnished by the state to each legal newspaper without charge. The copies shall be in tabloid form suitable for insertion in legal newspapers and shall be printed in not less than eight-point type; or

(2)

One (1) time without preprint at the rate of five cents (5¢) per word in every legal newspaper in the state.

(b)

Publication of the proposed constitution shall take place not less than sixty (60) days prior to the election at which it shall be voted upon by the people of the state.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 116, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-114.

7-9-310. Submission of proposed constitution to electors.

(a)

The constitutional convention may submit a new constitution as one (1) proposal to be voted on by the people, and it may submit proposed parts or alternative parts of a new constitution for separate votes. The proposals of the convention shall be submitted to the electors of this state for adoption or rejection at the general election held next following adjournment sine die of the convention.

(b)

The Governor shall issue a proclamation no later than the October 1 preceding the general election. Within ten (10) days after the proclamation by the Governor, the several sheriffs throughout the state shall issue their proclamations notifying the electors of the county that a new constitution will be voted upon at the general election. The returns of the issue at the general election shall be made, canvassed, and the results thereof declared in the same manner as is provided by law for initiative and referendum measures.

(c)(1)

If a majority of the electors of the state voting thereon at the general election shall vote for the proposed constitution, it shall become effective on the date and in the manner provided in the proposed constitution, or if no effective date shall be provided in the proposed constitution, it shall become effective as now provided by law with reference to initiated acts and amendments.

(2)

If a majority of the electors of the state voting thereon at the general election shall vote against the proposed constitution, it shall be deemed rejected by the electors, and the existing Arkansas Constitution shall continue to be the Arkansas Constitution until changed as provided by law. In the event that proposed parts or alternative parts of the new constitution are submitted for separate vote and that the people shall reject the new constitution, then all proposed parts or alternative parts for a new constitution voted upon separately shall be deemed rejected, even though the parts received a majority of the votes cast thereon. In no event shall the proposed parts or alternative parts of a new constitution voted upon separately be deemed to amend or change the existing Arkansas Constitution or any of its amendments if the people reject the proposed new constitution. It is the intent hereof that proposed parts or alternative parts of the new constitution upon which votes are cast separate and apart from the new constitution shall be of no force and effect in the event the people reject the proposed new constitution.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-112.

7-9-311. Proposal of amendments to present constitution.

The constitutional convention, if it shall not propose a new constitution, may propose one (1) or more amendments to the present constitution to be submitted to the voters at the next general election.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-113.

7-9-312. Expenses.

(a)

The appropriation to defray the expenses of any constitutional convention which may be called after a vote of the people shall be made by the next regular session of the General Assembly convening after an affirmative vote on the calling of a constitutional convention.

(b)

The proposed budget for the expenses of the convention shall be prepared by the Governor and promptly submitted to the General Assembly for action thereon.

(c)

Delegates to the convention shall be paid at the rate of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per diem for each day of attendance at meetings of the convention or its committees, plus their necessary travel expenses.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 2-111.

Subchapter 4

— Disclosure for Matters Referred to Voters

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§7-9-401 —7-9-411, may not apply to §§7-9-412 —7-9-415, which were enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1989, Nos. 261 and 634, § 13: approved Mar. 1, 1989 and Mar. 17, 1989, respectively. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of this State that in order to serve the public interest it is immediately necessary to require disclosure of important matters related to the qualification, passage or defeat of ballot questions and the passage or defeat of legislative questions referred to voters. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1235, § 6: Apr. 20, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of this act are necessary to guard against persons who may seek to avoid disclosures required by Arkansas Code 7-9-401, et seq. Therefore, in order to provide such safeguards with respect to any statewide public initiative, referendum, or measure referred to voters by the General Assembly, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1839, § 35: Became law without Governor's signature Apr. 20, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Code relating to campaign financing and ethics are vague or otherwise in need of modification; that this act accomplishes those purposes; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible so that those persons who are subject to the provisions of the various ethics and campaign finance statutes receive the benefit of the clarifications as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

7-9-401. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to Voters”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 261, § 1; 1989, No. 634, § 1; 1993, No. 1114, § 1.

7-9-402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Ballot question” means a question in the form of a statewide, county, municipal, or school district initiative or referendum which is submitted or intended to be submitted to a popular vote at an election, whether or not it qualifies for the ballot;

(2)(A)

“Ballot question committee” means any person, located within or outside Arkansas, that receives contributions for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of any ballot question, or any person, other than an elected official expending public funds, or an individual, located within or outside Arkansas, who makes expenditures for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of any ballot question.

(B)

A person other than an individual or an approved political action committee as defined in §7-6-201, located within or outside Arkansas, also qualifies as a ballot question committee if two percent (2%) or more of its annual revenues, operating expenses, or funds are used to make a contribution or contributions to another ballot question committee and if the contribution or contributions exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in value;

(3)(A)

“Contribution” means, whether direct or indirect, advances, deposits, transfers of funds, contracts, or obligations, whether or not legally enforceable, payments, gifts, subscriptions, assessments, payment for services, dues, advancements, forbearance, loans, pledges, or promises of money or anything of value, whether or not legally enforceable, to a person for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question or the passage or defeat of a legislative question.

(B)

“Contribution” includes the purchase of tickets for events such as dinners, luncheons, rallies, and similar fundraising events, and the granting of discounts or rebates by television and radio stations and newspapers, not extended on an equal basis to all persons seeking to expressly advocate the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question or the passage or defeat of a legislative question.

(C)

“Contribution” shall not include noncompensated, nonreimbursed volunteer personal services or travel;

(4)

“Contribution and expenditure” shall not include activities designed solely to encourage individuals to register to vote or to vote, or any communication by a bona fide church or religious denomination to its own members or adherents for the sole purpose of protecting the right to practice the religious tenets of the church or religious denomination, and “expenditure” shall not include one
made for communication by a person strictly with the person's paid members or shareholders;

(5)

“Disqualification of a ballot question” means any action or process, legal or otherwise, which seeks to prevent a ballot question from being on the ballot at an election;

(6)

“Elected official” means any person holding an elective office of any governmental body, whether elected or appointed to the office;

(7)

“Expenditure” means a purchase, payment, distribution, gift, loan, or advance of money or anything of value, and a contract, promise, or agreement to make an expenditure, for goods, services, materials, or facilities for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question or the passage or defeat of a legislative question;

(8)

“Governmental body” means any office, department, commission, council, board, committee, legislative body, agency, or other establishment of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of the state, municipality, county, school district, improvement district, or any political district or subdivision thereof;

(9)

“Legislative question” means a question in the form of a measure referred by the General Assembly, a quorum court, a municipality, or a school district to a popular vote at an election;

(10)(A)

“Legislative question committee” means any person, located within or outside Arkansas, that receives contributions for the purpose of expressly advocating the passage or defeat of any legislative question or any person, other than an elected official expending public funds, or an individual, located within or outside Arkansas, who makes expenditures for the purpose of expressly advocating the passage or defeat of any legislative question.

(B)

A person other than an individual or an approved political action committee as defined in §7-6-201, located within or outside Arkansas, also qualifies as a legislative question committee if two percent (2%) or more of its annual revenues, operating expenses, or funds are used to make a contribution or contributions to another legislative question committee and if the contribution or contributions exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in value;

(11)(A)

“Person” means any individual, business, proprietorship, firm, partnership, joint venture, syndicate, business trust, labor organization, company, corporation, association, committee, or any other organization or group of persons acting in concert.

(B)

“Person” includes an elected official using public funds to expressly advocate the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of any ballot question or the passage or defeat of any legislative question; and

(12)

“Qualification of a ballot question” means any action or process, legal or otherwise, through which a ballot question obtains certification to be on the ballot at an election.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 261, § 2; 1989, No. 634, § 2; 1993, No. 1114, § 2; 1993, No. 1235, §§ 1, 2; 2001, No. 1839, § 17; 2003, No. 195, § 8; 2005, No. 1765, § 1; 2009, No. 473, §§ 10, 11; 2011, No. 721, § 13; 2013, No. 312, § 3; 2013, No. 382, §§ 7, 8; 2015, No. 226, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment added the subdivision designations in (2) and (8); inserted “or an approved political action committee as defined in §7-6-201” in (2)(B) and (8)(B), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment inserted “a public servant, a governmental body expending public funds, or” in (2)(A) and (8)(A).

The 2013 amendment by No. 312 substituted “an elected official” for “a public servant or governmental body” in (9)(B) [now (11)(B)].

The 2013 amendment by No. 382 inserted “expending public funds” following “public servant” in (2)(A) and (8)(A) [now (10)(A)].

The 2015 amendment substituted “an elected official expending public funds” for “a public servant expending public funds, a governmental body expending public funds” in (2)(A); inserted present (6) and redesignated former (6) as (7); inserted present (8) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and substituted “an elected official” for “a public servant expending public funds, a governmental body” in (10)(A).

7-9-403. Penalty.

Upon conviction, any person who knowingly fails to comply with any of the provisions of this subchapter shall be fined an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 261, § 3; 1989, No. 634, § 3.

7-9-404. Filing deadlines.

(a)(1)(A)

A ballot question committee or a legislative question committee shall file a statement of organization with the Arkansas Ethics Commission within five (5) days of receiving contributions or making expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question or the passage or defeat of a legislative question.

(B)

The commission shall maintain the statement of organization until notified of the committee's dissolution.

(2)

A ballot question committee or legislative question committee failing to file a statement of organization required by this section shall be subject to a late filing fee not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day the statement remains not filed.

(b)

The statement of organization for a ballot question committee as defined in §7-9-402(2)(A) or a legislative question committee as defined in §7-9-402(10)(A) shall include the following information:

(1)

The name, the street address, and where available, the telephone number of the committee. A committee address and telephone number may be that of the residence of an officer or a director of the committee;

(2)

The name, street address, and if available, the telephone number of the treasurer and other principal officers and directors of the committee;

(3)

The name and address of each financial institution in which the committee deposits money or anything else of monetary value;

(4)

The name of each person who is a member of the committee. A person that is not an individual may be listed by its name without also listing its own members, if any; and

(5)

A brief statement identifying the substance of each ballot question, the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of which the committee seeks to influence or of each legislative question, the passage or defeat of which the committee seeks to influence, and if known, the date each ballot or legislative question shall be presented to a popular vote at an election.

(c)

The statement of organization for a ballot question committee as defined in §7-9-402(2)(B) or a legislative question committee as defined in §7-9-402(10)(B) shall include:

(1)(A)

The name, the street address, and if available, the telephone number of the committee.

(B)

The address and telephone number of a committee in subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section may be that of the residence of an officer or a director of the committee;

(2)

The name, street address, and if available, the telephone number of the treasurer and the other principal officers and directors of the committee;

(3)

The name and address of each financial institution in which the committee deposits money or anything else of monetary value;

(4)(A)

The name of each person who is a member of the committee.

(B)

A person that is not an individual may be listed by its name without also listing its own members, if any; and

(5)

A brief statement identifying the substance of each ballot question, the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of which the committee seeks to influence, and if known, the date each ballot or legislative question shall be presented to a popular vote at an election.

(d)

When any of the information required in a statement of organization is changed, an amendment shall be filed within ten (10) days to reflect the change, except that changes in individual membership may be filed when the next financial report is required. A committee failing to file a change as required shall be subject to a late filing fee not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each day the change remains not filed.

(e)

Upon dissolution, a ballot question committee or a legislative question committee shall notify the commission in writing. Any remaining funds on hand at the time of dissolution shall be turned over to either:

(1)

The Treasurer of State for the benefit of the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund;

(2)

An organized political party as defined in §7-1-101 or a political party caucus of the General Assembly, the Senate, or House of Representatives;

(3)

A nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

(4)

Cities of the first class, cities of the second class, or incorporated towns; or

(5)

The contributors to the ballot or legislative question committee.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 261, § 4; 1989, No. 634, § 4; 1993, No. 1114, § 3; 1999, No. 553, § 24; 2001, No. 1839, § 18; 2005, No. 1284, §§ 9, 10; 2005, No. 1765, § 2; 2007, No. 221, § 13; 2007, No. 1001, § 1; 2015, No. 226, § 7; 2017, No. 721, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 221, in (c), substituted “financial report” for “campaign statement” and “shall be subject to a late filing fee not exceeding ten dollars ($10.00)” for “shall pay a late filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00).”

The 2007 amendment by No. 1001 substituted “fifty dollars ($50)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” in (a)(2); and substituted “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “ten dollars ($10.00)” in (c).

The 2015 amendment inserted present (d)(4) [now (e)(4)] and redesignated former (d)(4) as (d)(5) [now (e)(5)].

The 2017 amendment inserted “disqualification” in (a)(1)(A); inserted “for a ballot question committee as defined in §7-9-402(2)(A) or a legislative question committee as defined in §7-9-402(10)(A)” in the introductory language of (b); substituted “if available” for “where available” in (b)(2); inserted (c); and redesignated former (c) and (d) as present (d) and (e).

U.S. Code.

Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to in this section, is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).

7-9-405. Contributions and expenditures limited.

(a)

No ballot question committee or legislative question committee shall accept any contribution in cash, meaning currency or coin, that exceeds one hundred dollars ($100).

(b)

No ballot question committee or legislative question committee shall accept any contribution from a prohibited political action committee as defined in §7-6-201.

(c)

No ballot question committee, legislative question committee, or individual shall make an expenditure in cash that exceeds fifty dollars ($50.00) to influence the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question or the passage or defeat of a legislative question.

(d)

No contributions shall be made, directly or indirectly, by any person in a name other than the name by which the person is identified for legal purposes.

(e)(1)

No person shall make an anonymous contribution totaling fifty dollars ($50.00) or more to a ballot question committee or legislative question committee.

(2)

Any such anonymous contribution actually received by any ballot question committee or legislative question committee shall be promptly paid by the recipient to the Arkansas Ethics Commission for deposit into the State Treasury as general revenues.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 261, § 10; 1989, No. 634, § 10; 1991, No. 786, § 5; 1993, No. 1114, § 4; 2005, No. 1765, § 3; 2007, No. 1001, § 2; 2009, No. 473, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment, in (d)(1), substituted “fifty dollars ($50.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” and added “to a ballot question committee or legislative question committee” at the end.

The 2009 amendment inserted present (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

7-9-406. Financial reports — Requirement.

(a)

A ballot question committee or legislative question committee that either receives contributions or makes expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question or the passage or defeat of a legislative question shall file with the Arkansas Ethics Commission financial reports as required by §§7-9-407 —7-9-409.

(b)

An individual person who on his or her own behalf expends in excess of five hundred dollars ($500), excluding contributions, for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question or the passage or defeat of a legislative question shall file with the commission financial reports as required by §§7-9-407 —7-9-409.

(c)

An elected official expending public funds in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) for the purpose of expressly advocating the qualification, disqualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question or the passage or defeat of a legislative question shall file with the commission financial reports as required by §§7-9-407 —7-9-409.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, any report required by this subchapter shall be deemed timely filed if it is:

(1)

Hand-delivered to the commission on or before the date due;

(2)

Mailed to the commission, properly addressed, postage prepaid, bearing a postmark indicating that it was received by the post office or common carrier on or before the date due;

(3)

Received via facsimile by the commission on or before the date due, provided that the original is received by the commission within ten (10) days of the transmission; or

(4)

Received by the commission in a readable electronic format that is approved by the commission.

(e)

Whenever a report under this subchapter becomes due on a day that is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the report shall be due the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

(f)

A preelection report is timely filed if it is received by the commission no later than seven (7) days prior to the election for which it is filed.

(g)

A final financial report as described in §7-9-409(a)(3) is required regardless of whether a ballot question committee, legislative question committee, individual, or elected official received contributions or made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

Acts 1989, No. 261, § 5; 1989, No. 634, § 5; 1993, No. 1114, § 5; 1999, No. 553, § 26; 2001, No. 1839, § 19; 2003, No. 195, § 9; 2005, No. 1765, § 4; 2007, No. 221, § 14; 2013, No. 312, § 4; 2013, No. 1085, § 1; 2015, No. 226, § 8; 2017, No. 721, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “§§7-9-407 —7-9-409” for “§7-9-407” in (a), (b) and (c); added “Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section” at the beginning of (d) and made a related change; and added (f).

The 2013 amendment by No. 312 substituted “An elected official” for “A public servant or governmental body” in (c).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1085 added (g).

The 2015 amendment substituted “or elected official” for “public servant, or governmental body” in (g).

The 2017 amendment inserted “legislative question committee” in (g).

7-9-407. Financial report — Information.

A financial report of a ballot question committee, a legislative question committee, an individual person, or an elected official, as required by §7-9-406, shall contain the following information:

(1)

The name, address, and telephone number of the committee, individual person, or elected official filing the report;

(2)(A)

For a ballot question committee as defined in §7-9-402(2)(A) or a legislative question committee as defined in §7-9-402(10)(A):

(i)

The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the financial report;

(ii)

The total amount of expenditures made by the committee or on behalf of the committee by an advertising agency, public relations firm, or political consultant during the period covered by the financial report;

(iii)

The cumulative amount of contributions and expenditures reported under subdivisions (2)(A)(i) and (ii) of this section for each ballot question or legislative question;

(iv)

The balance of cash and cash equivalents on hand at the beginning and the end of the period covered by the financial report;

(v)

The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the financial report from persons who contributed less than fifty dollars ($50.00) and the cumulative amount of that total for each ballot question or legislative question;

(vi)

The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the financial report from persons who contributed fifty dollars ($50.00) or more and the cumulative amount of that total for each ballot question or legislative question;

(vii)

The name and street address of each person who contributed fifty dollars ($50.00) or more during the period covered by the financial report, together with the amount contributed, the date of receipt, and the cumulative amount contributed by that person for each ballot question or legislative question;

(viii)

For each person listed under subdivision (2)(A)(vii) of this section, the contributor's principal place of business, employer, occupation, the amount contributed, the date the contribution was accepted by the committee, and the cumulative amount contributed for each ballot question or legislative question;

(ix)

The name and address of each person who contributed a nonmoney item, together with a description of the item, the date of receipt, and the value, not including volunteer service by individuals;

(x)

[Repealed];

(xi)

A list of all expenditures by category, including without limitation the following:

(a)

Advertising;

(b)

Direct mail;

(c)

Office supplies;

(d)

Travel;

(e)

Expenses; and

(f)

Telephone; and

(xii)

The total amount of nonitemized expenditures made during the period covered by the financial report;

(B)

For a ballot question committee as defined in §7-9-402(2)(B) or a legislative question committee as defined in §7-9-402(10)(B) shall include the following information:

(i)

The total amount of contributions made by the committee to another ballot or legislative question committee reported during the period covered by the financial report; and

(ii)

The cumulative amount of contributions under subdivision (2)(B)(i) of this section;

(C)

For an individual person:

(i)

The total amount of expenditures made by the individual person or on behalf of the individual person by an advertising agency, public relations firm, or political consultant during the period covered by the financial report; and

(ii)

The cumulative amount of expenditures for each ballot question or legislative question; and

(D)

For an elected official using public funds:

(i)

The total amount of expenditures made by the elected official using public funds or on behalf of the elected official using public funds by an advertising agency, public relations firm, or political consultant during the period covered by the financial report; and

(ii)

The cumulative amount of expenditures for each ballot question or legislative question; and

(3)

The name and street address of each person to whom expenditures totaling one hundred dollars ($100) or more were made by the committee, individual person, or elected official using public funds, or on behalf of the committee, individual person, or elected official using public funds, by an advertising agency, public relations firm, or political consultant, together with the date and amount of each separate expenditure to each person during the period covered by the financial report and the purpose of each expenditure.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 261, § 6; 1989, No. 634, § 6; 1993, No. 1114, § 6; 2001, No. 1839, §§ 20, 21; 2003, No. 195, § 10; 2005, No. 1284, § 11; 2007, No. 1001, § 3; 2013, No. 312, § 5; 2013, No. 381, § 1; 2013, No. 1085, §
2; 2015, No. 226, § 9; 2017, No. 721, §§ 8-10.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment by No. 312 substituted “or an elected official” for “a public servant or a governmental body” in the introductory language; and substituted “or elected official” for “public servant or governmental body” in (1).

The 2013 amendment by No. 381 rewrote (2)(A)(ii) and (2)(B)(i); inserted “using public funds” following “servant” in the introductory language of (2)(C); and rewrote (2)(C)(i) and (3).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1085 rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendment substituted “elected official” for “public servant” throughout (2)(C) [now (2)(D)] and (3); and deleted “or governmental body using public funds” following “public funds” throughout (2)(C) [now (2)(D)] and (3).

The 2017 amendment substituted “ballot question committee as defined in §7-9-402(2)(A) or a legislative question committee as defined in §7-9-402(10)(A)” for “committee” in the introductory language of (2)(A); repealed (2)(A)(x); inserted (2)(B); and redesignated former (2)(B) and (2)(C) as present (2)(C) and (2)(D).

7-9-408. Financial reports — Verification.

The financial reports identified in §7-9-407 shall be verified by affidavit by the person filing them to the effect that to the best of his or her knowledge and belief the information disclosed is a complete, true, and accurate financial statement of contributions or expenditures.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 261, § 8; 1989, No. 634, § 8.